ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외활동 용품 > 야외 구조물 > 캐노피/차광막 부대용품: 캐노피/차광막 설치 키트; 캐노피/차광막 프레임; 캐노피 및 가제보 측면 벽; 캐노피/차광막 천; 캐노피 앵커 키트; 캐노피 폴대; 캐노피 말뚝; 캐노피 고정판/가방
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Vie en extérieur > Structures extérieures > Accessoires pour auvents et abris: Kits de fermeture pour auvents et abris; Cadres pour auvents et abris; Parois latérales pour canopées et gazebos; Bâches de auvents et abris; Kits d'ancrage pour canopée; Piquets pour auvents; Piquets pour canopée; Poids de lestage pour auvents
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Artículos de exterior > Estructuras de exteriores > Accesorios para pabellones y cenadores: Kits de pantalla para toldos y cenadores; Estructuras para pabellones y cenadores; Paredes laterales para carpas y toldos; Cubiertas para pabellones y cenadores; Kits de anclaje para toldos; Postes para cenadores; Estacas para toldos; Pesos para cenadores
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 戶外生活 > 戶外建物 > 戶外棚架/涼亭配件: 戶外棚架/涼亭布簾組; 戶外棚架/涼亭支架; 帳篷與涼亭邊布; 戶外棚架/涼亭頂布; 帳篷固定套件; 帳篷桿; 帳篷營釘; 帳篷重物
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Oleskelu ulkona > Ulkorakennukset > Katosten ja huvimajojen lisätarvikkeet: Katosten ja huvimajojen sivuseinäsetit; Katosten ja huvimajojen kehikot; Katokset ja huvimajojen sivuseinät; Katosten ja huvimajojen katot; Katosten ankkurisarjat; Katoksen tukikepit; Katosten vaarnat; Katosten painot
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Espaços residenciais externos > Estruturas externas > Acessórios para dosséis e gazebos: Kits para dosséis e gazebos; Molduras para dosséis e gazebos; Paredes laterais para tendas e gazebos; Coberturas para dosséis e gazebos; Kits de ancoragem para tendas; Postes para dosséis; Estacas para tendas; Pesos para dósseis
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Ev Dışında Yaşam > Dış Mekan Yapıları > Çardak ve Kamelya Aksesuarları: Çardak ve Kamelya Perde Setleri; Çardak ve Kamelya Çatıları; Tente ve Kamelya Yan Duvarları; Çardak ve Kamelya Örtüleri; Tente Ankraj Kitleri; Gölgelik Direkleri; Tente Kazıkları; Gölgelik Ağırlıkları
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > 屋外用家具・エクステリア > エクステリア > キャノピー・ガゼボ関連用品: キャノピー・ガゼボ用スクリーンキット; キャノピー・ガゼボ用フレーム; キャノピー・ガゼボ用サイドウォール; キャノピー・ガゼボ用トップ; キャノピーアンカーキット; キャノピー用ポール; キャノピー固定ペグ; キャノピー用ウエイト
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Living > Outdoor Structures > Canopy & Gazebo Accessories: Canopy & Gazebo Enclosure Kits; Canopy & Gazebo Frames; Canopy & Gazebo Side Walls; Canopy & Gazebo Tops; Canopy Anchor Kits; Canopy Poles; Canopy Stakes; Canopy Weights
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外生活用品 > 户外建筑 > 遮篷/凉棚配件: 遮篷/凉棚围挡套件; 遮篷/凉棚架; 遮篷/凉棚侧围; 遮篷/凉棚顶; 遮篷锚固套件; 帐篷立柱; 遮篷地钉; 帐篷负重固定物
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Exterior > Structuri de exterior > Accesorii pentru copertine și foișoare: Seturi incinte pentru copertine și foișoare; Cadre pentru copertine și foișoare; Pereți laterali pentru foișor sau copertină; Părți superioare pentru copertine și foișoare; Seturi de ancorare pentru copertine; Stâlpi pentru copertine și foișoare; Țepușe pentru fixarea cortului; Greutăți pentru copertine și foișoare
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri élet > Kültéri szerkezetek > Előtető- és pavilonkiegészítők: Előtető- és pavilonzáró készletek; Előtető- és pavilonkeretek; Pavilon- és sátor oldalfalak; Előtető- és pavilontetők; Pavilonrögzítő készlet / csomag; Előtetőoszlopok; Pavilon vagy sátorkarók; Előtetősúlyok
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > ชีวิตกลางแจ้ง > สิ่งก่อสร้างกลางแจ้ง > อุปกรณ์กระโจมและกาเซโบ: ที่กำบังสำหรับกระโจมและกาเซโบ; โครงกระโจมและกาเซโบ; ผนังด้านข้างสำหรับกระโจมและกาเซโบ; ส่วนบนของกระโจมและกาเซโบ; ชุดอุปกรณ์ยึดกระโจม; เสาคาโนปี; หมุดยึดกระโจม; ที่ถ่วงน้ำหนักคาโนปี
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Garten & Balkon > Gartenhäuschen & Gartenbauten > Pavillon-Zubehör: Seitenwand-Sets für Pavillons; Rahmen für Pavillons; Canopy- und Pavillon-Seitenwände; Dächer für Pavillions; Canopy-Ankersets; Stangen für Sonnendächer; Canopy-Zeltheringe; Gewichte für Sonnendächer
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Leve ute > Utendørsbygg > Tilbehør til baldakiner og lysthus: Dekksett til baldakiner og lysthus; Rammer til baldakiner og lysthus; Sidevegger til lysthus og markise; Tak til baldakiner og lysthus; Ankersett til markise; Baldakinstenger; Markisestenger; Baldakinvekter
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Отдых на открытом воздухе > Уличные конструкции > Аксессуары для навесов и беседок: Наборы стенок для навесов и беседок; Каркасы для навесов и беседок; Боковые стенки навеса и беседки; Крыши для навесов и беседок; Комплекты для крепления навеса; Стойки для навесов; Колышки для навеса; Грузы для навесов
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Buitenleven > Buitengebouwen > Accessoires voor luifels en prieeltjes: Afsluitsets voor luifels en prieeltjes; Frames voor luifels en prieeltjes; Zijwanden voor canopies en tuinpaviljoens; Doeken voor luifels en prieeltjes; Verankeringssets voor canopies; Luifelpalen; Tentstokken voor canopies; Luifelgewichten
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria ogrodowe > Architektura ogrodowa > Akcesoria do altan i tarasów: Zestawy ścianek do altan i tarasów; Ramy do altan i tarasów; Ścianki boczne do pawilonów i namiotów; Dachy do altan i tarasów; Zestawy kotw do pawilonów i namiotów; Maszty do altan; Śledzie i kotwy do pawilonów i namiotów; Obciążniki do altan
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Живот на открито > Външни конструкции > Аксесоари за навеси и беседки: Комплекти за затваряне за навеси и беседки; Рамки за навеси и беседки; Странични стени за навеси и беседки; Покриви за навеси и беседки; Комплекти за закрепване на навеси; Прътове за навеси; Колове за навеси; Тежести на навеси
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Cuộc sống ngoài trời > Kết cấu ngoài trời > Phụ kiện nhà/ lều bạt: Bộ tường vây nhà/ lều bạt; Khung nhà/ lều bạt; Vách cho nhà bạt và chòi nghỉ; Mái che nhà/ lều bạt; Bộ thiết bị neo giữ nhà bạt; Cọc dựng mái canopy; Cọc ghim nhà bạt; Tạ cố định mái canopy
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Υπαίθρια διαβίωση > Εξωτερικές κατασκευές > Αξεσουάρ για στέγαστρα & κιόσκια: Σετ περίφραξης για στέγαστρα & κιόσκια; Πλαίσια για στέγαστρα & κιόσκια; Πλαϊνά τοιχώματα τέντας & κιόσκι; Στέγες για στέγαστρα & κιόσκια; Κιτ αγκύρωσης τέντας; Στύλοι στεγάστρων; Πάσσαλοι τέντας; Βάρη στεγάστρων
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Gyvenimas lauke > Lauko konstrukcijos > Stoginių ir pavėsinių priedai: Stoginių ir pavėsinių korpusų rinkiniai; Stoginių ir pavėsinių rėmai; Stoginių ir pavėsinių šoninės sienos; Stoginių ir pavėsinių stogai; Stoginių tvirtinimo rinkiniai; Stoginių stulpai; Stoginių kuolai; Stoginių svoriai
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Terasa > Vonkajšie konštrukcie > Príslušenstvo pre prístrešky a altánky: Súpravy prístreškov a altánkov; Konštrukcie pre prístrešky a altánky; Bočné steny pre prístrešky a altánky; Strechy pre prístrešky a altánky; Súpravy kotiev pre prístrešky; Stĺpy pre prístrešky; Kolíky pre prístrešky; Závažia pre prístrešky
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Utomhusliv > Utomhusbyggnader > Tillbehör till tält och lusthus: Skärmkit till baldakiner och lusthus; Stommar till tält och lusthus; Sidoskydd för partytält; Tak till tält och lusthus; Förankringssatser för partytält; Baldakinstolpar; Tältpinnar för partytält; Baldakinvikter
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Bydlení na zahradě > Zahradní architektura > Přístřešky a altány – příslušenství: Stínicí a krycí plachty na přístřešky a altány; Rámy přístřešků a altánů; Boční stěny k altánům a markýzám; Střechy přístřešků a altánů; Upevňovací sady pro markýzy; Tyče k přístřeškům a stanům; Kolíky pro markýzy; Závaží k přístřeškům a stanům
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Vita all'aperto > Strutture da esterno > Accessori per baldacchini e gazebo: Kit zanzariere per baldacchini e gazebo; Strutture per baldacchini e gazebo; Pareti laterali Canopy e gazebo; Tetti per baldacchini e gazebo; Kit di ancoraggio Canopy; Pali per baldacchini; Canopy; Contrappesi per baldacchini
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Udendørsliv > Udendørskonstruktioner > Baldakiner og lysthuse – tilbehør: Baldakiner og lysthuse – afskærmning; Baldakiner og lysthuse – rammer; Sidevægge til udhæng og pavillioner; Baldakiner og lysthuse – toppe; Fastgøringssæt til pavilloner; Stolper til udhæng; Pæle til pavilloner; Modvægte til udhæng
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Boravak na otvorenom > Vanjske konstrukcije > Pribor za nadstrešnice i sjenice: Kompleti za nadstrešnice i sjenice; Okviri za nadstrešnice i sjenice; Bočni zidovi za sjenice i nadstrešnice; Krovovi za nadstrešnice i sjenice; Kompleti za učvršćivanje sjenica; Supovi za nadstrešnice; Kolci za sjenice; Utezi za nadstrešnice
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Vida ao ar livre > Estruturas para exterior > Acessórios para tendas e gazebos: Kits para fechar tendas e gazebos; Estruturas para tendas e gazebos; Paredes laterais para toldos e gazebos; Partes superiores para tendas e gazebos; Kits de ancoragem para toldos; Estacas para tendas; Estacas para toldos; Pesos para tendas
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Bivanje na prostem > Zunanje konstrukcije > Dodatki za nadstreške in vrtne paviljone: Kompleti ohišij za nadstreške in vrtne paviljone; Okvirji za nadstreške in vrtne paviljone; Stranske stene za šotore in paviljone; Zgornji deli za nadstreške in vrtne paviljone; Kompleti sidrišč za šotore; Palice za nadstreške; Klini za šotore; Uteži za nadstreške